src/main/resources/com/itextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/lv.xml
<patterns>
d4z
d4ž
a2i
a2u
i2e
e2i
u2i
i2u
o2i
o2u
e2u
.vi1s2a.
.vi1s2?.
.vi1s2i.
.vi1s2os.
.vi1s2u.
.vi1s2iem.
o1p?
?1r?
i1ta
?1ga
?1žu
?1to
?1ni
i1r?
i1?o
?1bu
o1m?
o1k?
o1?i
?1lo
e1??
o1??
e1la
i1šo
o1bi
?1c?
?1ru
o1si
u1no
e1h?
?1n?
e1b?
i1ru
o1s?
a1?a
?1?a
o1r?
i1ke
o1ra
u1te
i1zo
i1gi
?1ma
?1?e
?1ca
o1d?
a1n?
?1ge
e1?i
?1b?
?1t?
?1fi
i1zi
o1l?
e1še
e1g?
i1fo
a1?o
u1to
?1z?
?1gu
?1ša
i1?i
?1n?
?1ma
?1te
?1k?
?1m?
u1zu
o1s?
?1bu
?1ga
e1di
?1te
a1??
e1t?
i1že
o1fo
?1pu
o1hu
?1do
o1du
?1ma
?1mi
e1re
i1ha
i1be
e1lu
?1ja
?1ta
a1š?
a1da
?1c?
i1bu
a1p?
u1??
e1zu
?1no
e1n?
i1no
e1m?
?1?a
?1p?
?1be
?1mo
?1ja
e1ji
?1re
e1ce
?1ri
?1t?
?1ni
?1ž?
i1ži
a1f?
a1be
e1š?
e1?o
e1p?
e1??
u1?i
?1t?
a1ci
e1j?
a1z?
o1l?
u1ga
?1ci
a1ke
e1ho
i1n?
?1š?
e1si
e1bo
o1??
u1?i
u1s?
?1b?
o1ša
?1ro
?1ce
i1z?
i1ve
o1?u
i1d?
o1ku
e1v?
a1ri
u1s?
i1p?
i1d?
o1p?
?1v?
a1me
?1ze
?1b?
u1?e
a1b?
a1ja
?1?o
a1j?
e1fe
o1pu
o1to
?1v?
a1ki
o1m?
o1lo
a1lo
?1?i
e1š?
?1d?
?1c?
o1zo
o1g?
o1g?
?1t?
e1z?
?1le
e1g?
?1na
o1me
e1po
e1fu
a1?e
u1r?
u1ri
?1jo
e1d?
a1?a
a1ž?
?1?a
?1ne
a1z?
?1v?
e1so
o1mi
o1šo
?1s?
?1?u
e1ga
i1p?
e1vu
o1ru
?1ju
u1?i
?1va
a1hu
?1s?
e1?a
i1r?
a1??
?1ki
i1ti
u1cu
i1žu
?1jo
u1ki
u1mu
o1??
e1ma
?1?o
?1de
o1?o
?1?u
i1?a
u1?a
u1m?
o1he
i1l?
a1de
o1fa
?1ro
o1s?
?1ri
?1ti
o1b?
a1j?
?1zu
?1v?
e1?e
o1?a
?1de
?1še
a1k?
?1ja
o1d?
e1ži
e1ri
?1g?
e1ki
u1ze
u1ma
i1v?
?1p?
u1lu
e1ti
o1??
a1?i
?1z?
a1?o
i1?i
o1ke
a1?u
i1v?
u1?u
u1ca
u1vu
o1?a
i1ri
o1?o
u1co
a1r?
o1j?
?1bi
e1??
?1r?
e1k?
i1pi
a1ka
?1vu
?1ža
e1m?
e1v?
o1gi
a1p?
?1z?
i1c?
e1va
o1n?
?1ru
e1p?
a1ce
?1k?
o1ja
a1h?
a1bo
?1mu
?1ve
i1n?
i1fi
o1va
u1žu
e1?i
?1n?
i1li
i1?o
u1la
?1?e
e1ca
a1t?
?1zi
a1b?
?1p?
?1su
?1p?
?1zu
?1di
e1lo
?1m?
e1ci
a1ža
?1to
e1r?
?1la
u1?u
o1??
?1pa
e1l?
e1s?
e1b?
i1co
i1??
a1šo
?1ku
u1š?
o1di
a1?a
?1pa
o1pi
a1ž?
a1si
a1ha
u1šo
?1m?
?1mo
?1žo
?1lu
e1ž?
o1?i
?1v?
a1žo
i1z?
a1ku
o1zi
o1d?
e1cu
?1no
e1zi
e1j?
?1?o
i1ce
?1l?
a1ž?
o1m?
i1b?
o1re
e1z?
?1ra
a1gi
i1l?
?1b?
?1šu
e1bi
i1g?
?1?i
?1va
?1to
u1ce
a1p?
?1gi
i1?e
?1k?
e1??
?1ža
u1ve
u1vo
?1no
o1bu
a1t?
e1fi
e1?o
?1ži
a1t?
?1ti
?1la
i1ho
?1gi
i1f?
a1t?
?1?i
a1mi
e1ra
u1ja
e1me
?1bu
i1pu
o1la
a1??
u1šu
o1ža
a1r?
?1?a
e1?u
?1lo
o1nu
?1j?
a1d?
u1r?
u1r?
?1žo
i1m?
a1zo
o1žu
?1da
?1co
?1z?
?1sa
?1šu
?1po
i1si
u1z?
?1ri
u1z?
?1g?
e1pu
?1du
e1c?
?1ji
i1bi
?1r?
i1?i
u1nu
i1ki
a1m?
?1ni
?1fe
?1ca
?1?i
u1go
a1nu
e1n?
u1ku
?1ži
?1go
e1?e
?1za
?1??
i1?e
?1go
a1go
e1b?
i1ze
e1š?
o1k?
o1p?
i1na
?1ra
?1j?
o1za
e1z?
a1l?
e1??
a1je
?1si
?1bo
u1g?
i1s?
u1ši
u1b?
a1v?
e1ko
?1šu
?1??
i1mo
e1??
i1t?
u1??
a1??
u1na
?1vo
?1me
a1h?
?1ka
?1m?
?1l?
?1tu
e1je
?1v?
a1ba
?1d?
?1ko
?1c?
?1n?
a1??
u1ju
?1ž?
?1mo
i1ge
?1p?
e1l?
i1??
a1s?
e1ni
a1ma
a1tu
i1k?
a1bi
i1j?
?1?u
e1f?
u1ta
?1d?
a1g?
i1l?
i1?i
e1?a
?1ti
?1bi
a1ši
a1l?
i1ja
e1mu
o1h?
u1j?
?1ša
i1s?
u1po
?1c?
a1se
o1?e
u1fo
?1s?
?1b?
o1co
o1??
?1?a
e1že
u1t?
?1ku
u1?a
u1zi
e1do
i1so
o1fi
?1s?
i1p?
?1ši
a1d?
?1ti
u1?o
u1pa
o1ka
o1c?
i1pe
?1m?
?1p?
?1p?
?1p?
o1b?
e1??
a1m?
?1r?
o1de
i1?a
o1š?
?1gu
u1bi
?1ka
?1nu
u1ži
u1so
?1ka
?1le
?1pe
u1??
?1me
u1d?
i1ž?
i1du
?1ra
o1vo
o1f?
o1so
?1??
e1d?
?1gu
o1bo
e1h?
?1?i
?1?o
a1d?
u1di
?1se
?1s?
?1n?
a1n?
?1r?
o1hi
o1š?
i1l?
?1l?
i1te
u1še
?1tu
u1?o
e1ši
?1ba
e1?a
u1si
?1zo
?1k?
i1gu
?1da
i1s?
o1b?
a1mo
?1g?
?1ve
u1b?
e1?o
?1vo
?1m?
u1?u
?1tu
i1c?
u1fa
?1t?
?1gu
o1ga
i1mi
i1f?
i1?e
?1co
u1ž?
i1z?
i1vu
a1ju
i1ca
?1?u
?1re
?1bi
e1ro
i1f?
a1he
u1mo
i1jo
e1bu
?1ro
a1te
?1?i
?1di
i1b?
u1?i
u1le
a1na
e1t?
e1b?
o1t?
?1ze
?1fu
?1be
a1p?
u1de
i1d?
e1ve
?1di
a1vo
u1l?
e1pi
u1d?
?1d?
o1jo
i1žo
?1?e
o1n?
e1m?
?1z?
a1ro
?1r?
a1že
u1je
a1ti
?1c?
i1t?
?1vi
?1jo
e1co
i1t?
i1bo
?1pe
e1t?
o1p?
?1se
a1??
?1ji
a1?o
e1za
?1m?
a1ž?
e1šo
?1?u
?1j?
o1su
e1ja
o1ta
e1l?
o1ze
?1v?
o1v?
a1v?
i1k?
?1z?
u1ha
?1p?
i1de
o1n?
?1b?
?1tu
a1ži
?1žu
o1??
o1?o
i1??
u1ci
?1ca
?1sa
e1r?
i1b?
e1ne
a1š?
u1gi
?1mu
a1z?
i1lo
?1c?
u1l?
e1?o
a1bu
i1n?
?1d?
?1t?
?1ko
?1šu
o1?i
a1ta
i1la
a1va
a1še
a1hi
a1ca
e1be
e1ž?
a1su
?1d?
o1da
e1?o
e1?u
e1pa
?1j?
e1s?
a1?i
?1so
?1nu
i1vo
?1lo
?1n?
?1m?
?1cu
o1ž?
?1j?
?1c?
a1?u
o1z?
a1lu
?1lu
o1?u
a1vu
i1tu
i1?u
i1?o
i1ko
a1fa
?1pi
i1go
i1me
a1fi
e1s?
?1ju
o1pe
a1s?
a1n?
?1že
?1ve
i1po
o1z?
a1ne
e1sa
a1l?
?1ša
?1gi
?1l?
i1m?
u1v?
?1m?
?1m?
u1ro
?1po
o1ju
i1fu
i1j?
i1ga
?1t?
?1lu
?1s?
a1g?
?1b?
a1la
o1ri
?1šo
?1?a
o1f?
e1li
?1ko
u1va
?1šo
a1zi
e1d?
i1da
i1š?
i1h?
i1ne
i1šu
?1ku
e1??
o1na
?1ža
o1?a
?1fa
o1t?
?1d?
o1t?
i1hi
?1mu
?1so
e1c?
?1zi
?1c?
u1š?
o1no
?1?e
u1bu
?1g?
o1ve
a1??
i1lu
i1pa
e1ka
?1ci
u1??
o1sa
o1go
i1nu
?1žo
i1s?
o1f?
a1pu
a1du
?1?i
o1ba
i1fa
e1mi
o1cu
u1ža
?1mi
a1??
i1?u
o1ž?
?1k?
?1?e
u1??
e1da
?1d?
?1?o
?1pa
?1de
o1ma
i1d?
?1?o
?1žu
o1ko
a1v?
?1z?
?1s?
?1do
u1c?
?1??
u1du
e1ju
?1si
o1v?
i1ša
u1fe
o1ji
?1re
?1??
u1?a
?1ca
a1šu
?1nu
?1le
e1?i
?1t?
o1ge
i1v?
?1za
?1n?
?1ma
?1?u
e1l?
?1s?
?1li
?1ne
i1m?
?1pi
a1m?
a1žu
i1ju
?1vu
u1n?
?1ru
e1vi
a1pa
i1b?
o1c?
?1l?
e1ku
u1l?
i1se
e1v?
?1j?
e1p?
?1ci
o1ši
a1h?
a1k?
u1ji
?1r?
?1s?
i1ro
o1r?
?1ki
o1ro
e1ru
o1k?
?1su
a1??
?1t?
?1ba
e1?e
e1nu
?1te
?1vo
a1sa
e1n?
?1ž?
o1že
?1do
?1j?
?1vu
o1vi
u1ba
?1na
?1m?
a1ji
u1ti
e1mo
a1ra
e1hi
o1te
u1bo
e1su
i1f?
?1pi
i1?i
?1?u
?1l?
?1ro
o1z?
a1vi
o1ni
?1za
o1do
?1z?
o1g?
u1z?
u1li
u1da
a1?i
e1ta
i1ra
?1?a
a1j?
?1ba
a1c?
u1ra
i1k?
i1zu
?1nu
a1š?
e1to
u1g?
?1p?
a1ho
?1je
?1?a
a1ve
o1šu
u1?o
?1mi
u1s?
a1d?
e1c?
?1r?
u1ko
?1??
?1zu
?1mu
?1sa
?1?u
u1ka
i1ba
?1vi
?1ga
?1?e
a1r?
u1ša
u1c?
a1co
?1cu
o1vu
i1je
u1do
o1c?
?1vi
i1j?
a1ze
a1mu
o1?i
e1ža
o1??
i1?a
i1m?
?1c?
?1la
e1d?
?1n?
?1po
?1?i
?1n?
?1be
u1se
?1ci
?1??
?1ke
?1c?
?1sa
?1li
a1??
u1pe
?1ku
a1b?
u1pu
o1ca
u1ne
?1??
u1mi
e1du
i1?u
u1p?
?1?a
?1pu
u1be
o1?u
o1š?
?1šo
?1me
a1?a
u1zo
?1z?
?1ce
e1t?
o1?u
?1jo
u1t?
?1cu
i1vi
e1ž?
a1jo
e1jo
?1bi
u1n?
?1?u
e1zo
i1ma
u1v?
o1j?
o1ha
?1pu
e1ša
a1ru
a1li
u1m?
?1ve
?1pe
i1cu
?1n?
?1s?
e1pe
?1z?
i1r?
?1pe
o1po
?1r?
a1?e
?1gi
e1ž?
?1lu
i1su
?1t?
a1no
?1ži
a1s?
a1ko
i1ž?
u1jo
i1va
?1ji
a1fe
o1pa
e1r?
e1š?
?1cu
i1š?
?1ž?
e1?e
?1c?
a1po
i1t?
?1ne
?1va
e1se
?1ra
o1gu
?1de
u1d?
i1di
u1r?
?1n?
a1to
e1f?
a1so
e1ze
?1le
o1mu
?1ta
e1?u
a1z?
?1??
o1?e
e1na
?1v?
?1du
u1žo
i1n?
?1si
i1ka
?1fe
e1no
i1le
e1p?
e1??
?1go
i1ni
e1?a
a1??
?1be
a1ša
e1gi
i1mu
?1b?
a1??
?1š?
a1b?
?1du
o1ci
?1bo
?1ki
o1mo
?1lo
o1l?
o1le
a1g?
u1k?
?1vi
?1l?
u1??
?1mo
a1c?
u1?a
?1to
a1f?
u1?i
e1fa
?1ša
o1b?
a1?i
?1da
a1m?
i1g?
a1??
e1c?
?1ta
i1re
?1me
?1d?
a1re
?1li
a1ga
o1tu
u1p?
e1ha
?1??
e1tu
i1??
e1k?
?1b?
o1??
a1zu
?1s?
?1ne
?1ga
?1vo
o1ho
?1??
o1r?
?1ju
o1fu
?1ji
o1l?
?1do
i1to
u1b?
u1ge
u1c?
a1le
u1??
?1ce
a1?u
?1ze
e1šu
?1ja
a1v?
i1??
?1na
o1ne
?1d?
?1?a
u1su
u1sa
?1di
?1su
e1fo
?1ni
?1p?
i1ku
?1pa
?1po
?1zi
i1?a
i1ši
?1l?
?1no
a1j?
?1g?
o1z?
?1d?
o1?i
?1r?
?1zi
?1pi
?1ge
o1m?
i1k?
e1g?
u1gu
i1z?
a1gu
a1l?
i1c?
?1l?
o1?e
o1se
?1v?
?1ru
a1fo
e1s?
?1re
?1l?
e1?i
a1?u
e1j?
?1ža
?1zu
e1?i
u1pi
?1m?
o1??
o1ti
u1p?
e1z?
u1fi
e1?e
?1j?
u1v?
?1?i
u1ž?
?1li
e1de
o1be
?1z?
e1hu
e1he
?1l?
u1t?
e1n?
a1s?
?1se
?1?o
a1?i
?1ze
o1je
?1te
e1k?
o1li
?1ce
o1v?
i1ci
?1so
e1ge
i1še
a1ni
i1do
?1l?
o1ž?
o1še
o1zu
a1cu
e1m?
e1gu
?1ta
a1do
e1ba
?1?i
e1žo
?1g?
a1za
?1la
?1??
a1pi
?1n?
?1š?
i1š?
o1?e
?1mi
u1z?
i1??
?1ko
o1d?
?1?i
a1??
?1su
?1l?
e1??
?1?e
u1za
o1ži
o1fe
?1t?
o1ki
?1za
e1le
?1b?
a1di
o1s?
?1žu
?1bo
u1me
a1r?
i1?o
?1si
?1s?
u1ni
?1ka
?1?i
o1t?
?1šo
u1tu
e1žu
i1ža
o1lu
?1r?
?1ju
u1š?
a1?e
?1so
?1da
?1ba
?1ri
o1ce
?1ki
i1??
a1pe
o1š?
u1?o
?1zo
?1r?
e1go
e1te
i1za
e1vo
u1vi
i1fe
i1?u
?1zo
?1z?
o1j?
u1re
?1?a
?1p?
o1žo
u1n?
u1?u
?1du
a1?u
u1m?
?1pu
u1lo
i1ji
?1r?
?1r?
e1r?
u1ru
a1c?
o1r?
?1na
u1?e
?1d?
u1t?
i1sa
at1tu
eg1r?
ak1so
it1de
eb1l?
et1v?
or1bi
al1ša
ap1d?
ak1na
um1ci
aš1le
?r1?e
en1ku
il1ki
?r1ku
at1n?
at1??
us1p?
os1v?
os1ci
an1ra
en1pa
ej1d?
až1v?
as1bu
?s1ga
i?1di
en1to
uj1me
or1ki
el1zo
ot1n?
es1ko
uz1gu
ak1ti
?r1ni
iz1hi
il1pu
es1ma
?t1vi
ag1r?
on1z?
?b1tu
ap1do
?t1v?
ul1s?
?k1l?
ur1so
ok1t?
?b1tu
?s1la
et1ve
al1mo
op1ša
en1ce
im1n?
uš1?a
ek1ti
iz1c?
er1di
ur1fa
an1t?
er1ba
as1pe
al1su
ip1so
al1c?
at1de
a?1ra
?k1šu
?g1li
om1ni
o?1ka
as1le
at1?i
id1r?
un1ve
al1k?
in1da
?r1ba
?s1žu
al1ka
up1j?
ur1gu
at1s?
?g1m?
?l1ti
al1va
u?1ku
ok1r?
er1gi
uz1?o
ak1š?
?m1re
iz1te
?t1v?
?g1ni
?g1ru
il1c?
ir1mu
ar1ku
ot1zi
ub1na
an1?e
om1b?
?g1si
el1le
av1ru
il1nu
?s1te
ur1k?
ik1ro
ep1nu
ur1v?
o?1lu
it1ma
il1ja
?j1t?
an1ga
eš1pa
?l1ce
ob1r?
ur1vi
up1ri
?z1t?
iz1?o
ap1ša
uz1ru
ut1r?
ar1to
ež1n?
aš1?u
a?1ce
al1ne
is1s?
ib1šo
uz1nu
ut1?u
ul1de
?r1ho
am1p?
?l1gu
um1vi
ik1to
?r1ze
ož1va
ez1n?
am1l?
ak1se
el1ko
ep1si
?j1tu
um1z?
at1ja
al1??
az1d?
or1to
ec1he
at1c?
en1ko
?s1ki
?g1sa
ef1ri
?r1sa
im1po
?t1r?
ed1vi
id1s?
?1dž?
up1la
?c1te
es1pu
uk1šo
?p1ni
?1dži
ak1la
en1na
as1ka
?m1di
ag1li
og1r?
ag1d?
oz1vi
an1ku
?k1n?
us1m?
er1ma
?b1ša
in1tu
ob1ti
ap1cu
es1v?
ac1ti
ur1pu
ar1k?
el1la
it1ta
am1le
ik1se
?k1ti
ar1sa
is1mu
ut1?e
?r1v?
u1dži
et1n?
id1ka
?l1se
ur1na
?r1zo
uz1li
?n1ka
as1ve
ab1la
a?1?e
?b1t?
el1v?
al1žu
at1p?
at1go
?r1la
e1dzi
iz1d?
ab1se
at1ž?
ir1ca
?r1su
u?1ma
el1pe
ej1ve
ap1ve
?g1r?
el1po
ed1lo
it1mo
ep1n?
uk1tu
at1šo
ap1š?
?r1?o
ak1s?
ek1t?
om1pe
ul1go
um1d?
ec1si
?d1vi
um1m?
iz1mo
ok1z?
?p1ro
?l1ko
?l1v?
ed1po
?l1zi
of1r?
?j1lo
ap1s?
ip1šo
is1pu
in1fe
ep1ra
at1ša
or1ga
on1g?
ak1šu
at1jo
es1pa
uz1ša
?r1su
uz1be
ik1s?
en1ša
ok1te
ok1bu
ur1ša
or1?e
?n1ta
ap1?i
iz1zu
im1t?
ap1te
on1n?
us1j?
ur1no
ab1ti
en1j?
op1so
e?1no
ur1ka
an1šo
ol1le
?s1mo
?s1t?
ek1t?
uz1s?
iš1??
um1p?
is1po
ob1l?
ap1za
ek1do
ez1m?
?d1la
uš1ka
of1ri
en1h?
?f1ri
uk1nu
iz1do
ej1ga
ul1ri
iz1fi
ir1na
is1ka
?r1do
en1šo
ož1ma
?s1t?
at1s?
um1la
oš1pa
eb1to
ez1?i
ej1ka
iv1žu
u?1?u
ik1na
il1ko
ol1mu
im1si
ap1ta
os1tu
us1t?
at1ko
ar1ci
i?1do
un1?i
oš1si
en1z?
ir1zo
i1dž?
uz1ba
er1v?
ip1ni
il1zu
in1p?
or1hi
iv1de
os1m?
uz1p?
?m1pi
os1t?
az1b?
al1de
on1de
uz1ce
em1ba
?r1?u
at1n?
?r1t?
ur1cu
ir1ku
?v1da
?p1ri
op1r?
ej1ni
am1d?
ak1va
ek1pi
up1ve
?t1ma
un1t?
aš1ma
?v1ja
um1ti
?z1m?
im1te
ev1r?
on1ti
ig1za
iz1g?
up1r?
id1p?
?r1c?
?r1l?
el1l?
us1ga
ez1da
ap1c?
ej1la
ag1da
uz1va
op1s?
??1ve
el1to
?z1k?
eš1vi
uz1v?
?1dze
is1m?
ef1r?
ab1ša
up1ma
?r1n?
aš1va
ab1ri
ob1t?
ik1s?
is1m?
ag1ša
?r1ka
??1mu
ev1ni
or1da
em1ze
?j1lo
at1r?
al1re
il1c?
?r1mi
et1ma
um1da
ob1le
?p1tu
el1p?
iz1?e
ez1tu
al1t?
ap1r?
iz1ta
em1ža
ar1gi
?v1re
as1k?
až1k?
eg1ta
al1g?
ap1le
ap1ro
?v1ni
op1ka
ik1vi
il1t?
ur1p?
ir1k?
i?1ne
iz1da
op1re
?l1ni
is1nu
ar1c?
ed1s?
ul1ka
?s1ma
op1ba
os1f?
ak1le
e?1m?
?b1šu
aš1ra
u?1pu
o?1v?
?r1šo
am1di
?r1žu
ed1pu
ed1ve
en1re
?k1li
uš1pi
ep1ta
al1ve
ad1ma
ez1ce
?g1t?
ud1r?
im1bi
ek1ra
iv1j?
ez1bi
iz1me
u?1t?
if1r?
ap1ku
id1ni
og1r?
?j1de
op1ko
iz1t?
un1ci
?t1ka
?j1n?
?r1p?
oš1?a
at1zu
?v1ga
os1na
og1ga
es1lu
?t1ko
az1va
em1zi
as1ke
an1si
iz1mi
er1v?
ep1s?
al1s?
us1c?
ul1sa
en1ta
or1v?
ek1t?
uz1žo
an1ma
i1dz?
ij1ku
id1la
?p1ta
??1ko
ur1ti
ap1n?
ot1re
eš1?u
un1de
?r1v?
uz1??
er1m?
o1džu
oš1ni
ij1k?
al1lo
ig1lo
er1r?
em1pu
ug1?o
?š1do
ip1ša
?s1t?
oš1ba
al1l?
eš1da
u?1??
?r1s?
in1de
em1to
?s1tu
ol1fi
or1m?
iv1pu
aš1la
ec1ho
?r1za
ar1ka
ub1s?
ap1zi
?p1to
?k1tu
er1te
ur1zu
?m1ka
on1ju
ap1go
us1lo
or1na
og1no
am1d?
?r1ta
?l1ne
er1c?
im1na
uz1z?
?r1no
aj1ci
ip1t?
it1?u
ag1ri
?r1b?
os1po
??1da
an1k?
om1b?
?r1ve
a?1?e
im1ti
al1ti
??1ni
in1na
ep1la
uz1di
iž1me
al1t?
in1si
ed1ma
or1tu
em1ta
ug1si
er1be
us1ra
il1mu
?r1ga
eb1lo
?r1r?
?t1re
al1la
et1vi
el1di
?r1ži
iz1ca
ad1da
?n1m?
ut1sa
ol1po
ez1ra
ir1š?
eg1šo
ud1pu
ud1l?
uk1s?
on1vu
em1p?
?k1b?
?r1d?
en1z?
?j1re
at1lo
ez1ni
et1ka
iv1ji
in1ku
or1b?
ok1ti
al1si
ur1z?
?n1ga
?r1pa
am1bi
at1ro
?r1bu
iz1??
ip1s?
uz1?i
ir1du
uh1t?
er1b?
ik1ga
?š1?i
iz1r?
it1da
ok1?u
?g1ta
ir1lo
an1ka
in1d?
es1v?
op1ma
um1s?
on1pa
em1p?
?k1ko
el1t?
uz1me
er1v?
?z1na
eg1ru
it1ga
us1du
?t1?u
ep1l?
ur1va
um1z?
?d1l?
o1dži
?r1bu
ak1t?
er1ta
?r1no
?r1p?
um1bi
en1ca
o?1c?
?j1mu
at1p?
?r1g?
ip1re
?r1vi
a?1?o
et1ni
ir1g?
?p1ne
ir1su
?t1me
eb1tu
in1c?
aš1?e
ip1ro
om1da
ep1t?
ef1ra
?1dza
?t1ku
ub1li
az1be
?s1ka
us1pa
ar1su
uf1li
?r1v?
?s1za
af1r?
uz1?a
e1dža
iz1b?
?t1di
en1n?
e?1??
es1ku
az1da
?g1ra
iz1g?
ar1??
er1šu
ud1ka
ed1ri
op1ra
ap1li
ap1d?
ed1la
an1r?
en1t?
?b1šo
an1c?
?j1da
es1t?
er1ko
?g1ta
el1zu
in1ne
er1bi
ig1me
ež1ni
ad1mi
aj1ni
el1li
ik1šu
?l1pu
ar1ga
et1ta
?c1še
uz1zu
om1b?
un1ku
?b1ni
ar1ža
?t1ni
is1tu
un1ze
aš1di
it1ni
